Utah statutes.
31A-23a-804.   Duties of insurers utilizing the services of a reinsurance intermediary-broker.

(1)  An insurer may not engage the services of any person, firm, association, or corporation to act as a reinsurance intermediary-broker on its behalf unless the person is licensed as required by Subsection 31A-23a-801(1).

(2)  An insurer may not employ an individual who is employed by a reinsurance intermediary-broker with which it transacts business, unless the reinsurance intermediary-broker is under common control with the insurer and subject to Title 31A, Chapter 16, Insurance Holding Companies.

(3)  The insurer shall annually obtain a copy of statements of the financial condition of each reinsurance intermediary-broker with which it transacts business.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 298, 2003 General Session

